Washington statutes.
RCW 4.24.640

Firearm safety program liability.

No person who owns, operates, is employed by, or volunteers at a program approved under RCW 77.32.155 shall be liable for any injury that occurs while the person who suffered the injury is participating in the course, unless the injury is the result of gross negligence.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 7 s 513.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Severability—1994 sp.s. c 7: See notes following RCW 43.70.540.